Wyoming, session 2026, SF0018.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-4-301 is amended to read:
21-4-301. Schools to be free and accessible to all
children; minimum school year.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the public
schools of each school district in the state shall at all
times be equally free and accessible to all children,
including children attending school on a part-time basis,
resident therein of five (5) years of age as of August 1,
or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under
W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii), of the year in which they may
register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b)
and under the age of twenty-one (21), subject to
regulations of the board of trustees.
(b) Each school district shall operate its schools
and its classes for a minimum of one hundred seventy-five
(175) days each school year unless an alternative schedule
has been approved by the state board. Prior to submission
of a proposed alternative schedule to the state board, the
board of trustees shall hold at least two (2) advertised
public meetings within the district, at which the board
shall present the proposed alternative schedule and respond
to public questions and comments. Any school district
operating under an alternative schedule shall annually
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0018
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
evaluate the effectiveness of that schedule in meeting the
educational goals and purposes for which the schedule was
adopted.
(b)(c) A parent, guardian or other person having
control or charge of any child eligible to attend public
school in Wyoming under subsection (a) of this section
shall have the option to apply for the ESA program
specified by W.S. 21-2-901 on behalf of the child.
Section 2. W.S. 21-4-301 as amended by section 1 of
this act, shall apply to enrollment of children beginning
school year 2026-2027 and each school year thereafter.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0018
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3